Maryland, session 2026, SB0598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–805.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0598*

SENATE BILL 598
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS
INFRASTRUCTURE, HARDWARE, OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY,
EFFICIENCY, RELIABILITY, OR RESILIENCE OF A NEW OR EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINE FACILITY.
(II) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” INCLUDES:
1. GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
2. HIGH–PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; AND
3. STORAGE USED AS TRANSMISSION.
(3) (I) “AUTOMATED LOAD MANAGEMENT” MEANS THE USE OF A
POWER CONTROL SYSTEM TO LIMIT OR CONTROL ELECTRIC CURRENT OR POWER TO
STAY WITHIN SAFE, DEFINED LIMITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH ELECTRIC INDUSTRY
STANDARDS.
(II) “AUTOMATED LOAD MANAGEMENT” INCLUDES:
1. A SINGLE DEVICE USED TO CONTROL ELECTRIC LOAD;
AND
2. MULTIPLE DEVICES OPERATING TOGETHER AS A
SYSTEM TO CONTROL ELECTRIC LOAD.
(4) “DEMAND FLEXIBILITY” MEANS THE ABILITY TO SHIFT ENERGY
DEMAND TO MEET BULK POWER SYSTEM OR LOCAL DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM NEEDS
IN RESPONSE TO CHANGING ELECTRIC SYSTEM CONDITIONS AND PRICES IN ORDER
TO:
(I) INTEGRATE INCREASED RENEWABLE ENERGY SUPPLY;
(II) IMPROVE RELIABILITY AND ENERGY SYSTEM EFFICIENCY;
(III) LOWER COSTS; AND
(IV) REDUCE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS BY DECREASING NET
SYSTEM PEAK DEMAND OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PEAK DEMAND.

SENATE BILL 598 3
(5) “DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(6) “ELECTRIC SYSTEM PLAN” MEANS A PLAN SUBMITTED BY AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMAR
20.50.15.04.
(7) (I) “FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION” MEANS A METHOD FOR
CONNECTING DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM IN A MANNER THAT OPTIMIZES THE USE OF THE EXISTING ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.
(II) “FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION” INCLUDES THE USE OF A
LIMITED EXPORT AGREEMENT.
(8) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS HARDWARE OR
SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY OR EFFICIENCY OF THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
(I) DYNAMIC LINE RATING;
(II) ADVANCED POWER FLOW CONTROL;
(III) TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION; AND
(IV) ENERGY STORAGE USED AS DISTRIBUTION OR
TRANSMISSION.
(9) “GRID FLEXIBILITY–ENABLED BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION AND
EFFICIENCY” MEANS A CHANGE IN END–USE EQUIPMENT TO AN EFFICIENT
ELECTRIC TYPE FOR ANY BUILDING END–USE IF THE END–USE EQUIPMENT IS
PAIRED TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE WITH ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES
AND ENROLLMENT IN DEMAND FLEXIBILITY PROGRAMS OR RATES TO ENCOURAGE
THE USE OF THE ELECTRIC GRID IN OFF–PEAK HOURS AND MITIGATE USE DURING
PEAK DEMAND, INCLUDING A CHANGE IN END–USE EQUIPMENT FOR:
(I) WATER HEATING;
(II) SPACE HEATING;
(III) LAUNDRY; AND
(IV) INDUSTRIAL PROCESSES.

SENATE BILL 598
(10) “NONWIRES SOLUTION” MEANS A PROJECT OR OTHER SOLUTION
THAT USES ONE OR MORE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES OR LEADS TO THE
INTRODUCTION OF NEW OR MODIFICATIONS OF EXISTING ENERGY MANAGEMENT
PRACTICES, STANDARDS, OR PROTOCOLS THAT ADDRESS A SYSTEM CONSTRAINT OR
PROVIDE OTHER ELECTRIC GRID SERVICES TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(11) “VIRTUAL POWER PLANT” MEANS A NETWORK OF MULTIPLE,
DECENTRALIZED, DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES INTEGRATED TO BALANCE
ENERGY SUPPLY AND DEMAND ON A LARGE SCALE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY 3 YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH ELECTRIC
COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT A COST CONTAINMENT PLAN TO THE COMMISSION.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY:
(I) ALLOW ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO SUBMIT THEIR
RESPECTIVE COST CONTAINMENT PLANS ON A STAGGERED SCHEDULE; AND
(II) ADJUST THE SUBMISSION PLAN DEADLINE IF THE
COMMISSION REQUIRES OR ALLOWS AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO SUBMIT ITS COST
CONTAINMENT PLAN AS A PART OF:
1. A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN APPLICATION;
2. A RATE CASE FILING; OR
3. AN ELECTRIC SYSTEM PLAN.
(C) THE COST CONTAINMENT PLAN SHALL INCLUDE DESCRIPTIONS OF:
(1) ELECTRIC SYSTEM CONSTRAINT SOLUTIONS IN THE MOST RECENT
ELECTRIC SYSTEM PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE COMMISSION THAT AVOID OR
MINIMIZE CAPITAL EXPENDITURES, INCLUDING ALL NONWIRES SOLUTIONS AND
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE INTEGRATION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM PLAN;
(2) PROGRAMS, OFFERINGS, OR INVESTMENTS FROM OTHER FILINGS
MADE TO THE COMMISSION THAT AVOID OR MINIMIZE CAPITAL EXPENDITURES ON
THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM WHILE IMPROVING THE
RELIABILITY, RESILIENCE, AND CAPACITY OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION OR

SENATE BILL 598 5
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM THAT ACHIEVES OPERATIONAL AND PLANNING
OPTIMIZATION, INCLUDING:
(I) ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(II) AUTOMATED LOAD MANAGEMENT;
(III) DEMAND FLEXIBILITY;
(IV) FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION;
(V) GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
(VI) GRID FLEXIBILITY;
(VII) GRID FLEXIBILITY–ENABLED BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION
AND EFFICIENCY; AND
(VIII) VIRTUAL POWER PLANTS;
(3) HOW THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IS COORDINATING ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM INVESTMENTS WITH ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM
PLANNING IN THE PJM REGION IN A MANNER THAT IS MOST COST–EFFECTIVE TO
RATEPAYERS; AND
(4) HOW THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IS INCREASING ITS INVESTMENTS
IN REGIONAL TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES AND PROJECTS RELATIVE TO
ITS INVESTMENTS IN LOCAL AND SUPPLEMENTAL TRANSMISSION PROJECTS.
(D) THE COST CONTAINMENT PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL COMBINE TO REDUCE THE UTILITY’S PEAK ELECTRIC SYSTEM
LOAD BY AT LEAST 20% FROM 2025 LEVELS BY 2030.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY APPROVE,
OR DENY EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S COST CONTAINMENT PLAN BASED ON
WHETHER THE PLAN:
(I) ADEQUATELY INCORPORATES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C)(1) AND (2) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) MEETS OR EXCEEDS THE GOAL IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION; AND

SENATE BILL 598
(III) IS PROJECTED TO PRODUCE DEMONSTRABLE AND
SIGNIFICANT COST SAVINGS INDIVIDUALLY OR IN THE AGGREGATE, ACCORDING TO
THE COMMISSION’S UNIFIED BENEFIT COST ANALYSIS FRAMEWORK.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO
CURE ANY DEFICIENCY IDENTIFIED DURING THE COMMISSION’S REVIEW OF THE
COST CONTAINMENT PLAN.
(F) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT A PROGRESS REPORT
TO THE COMMISSION ON THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S PROGRESS TOWARD
IMPLEMENTING AN APPROVED COST CONTAINMENT PLAN.
(2) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT THE PROGRESS
REPORT AT THE SAME TIME THE ELECTRIC COMPANY SUBMITS ITS ELECTRIC
SYSTEM PLAN AND SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF ALL ONGOING ACTIONS, INITIATIVES, OR
PROJECTS AND ANY PLANNED ACTIONS, INITIATIVES, OR PROJECTS INCLUDED IN
THE COST CONTAINMENT PLAN; AND
(II) AN ANALYSIS DOCUMENTING THE DECISION–MAKING
PROCESS FOR THE SELECTED ACTIONS, INITIATIVES, OR PROJECTS INCLUDED IN
THE COST CONTAINMENT PLAN AND ANY REJECTED ALTERNATIVES.
(G) IF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY FAILS TO MEET THE GOAL UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY, BY ORDER:
(1) IMPOSE ONE OR MORE FINES;
(2) REDUCE THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S RETURN ON EQUITY; AND
(3) FULLY OR PARTIALLY DENY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S COST
RECOVERY FOR IMPLEMENTING THE APPROVED COST CONTAINMENT PLAN.
7–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Distributed energy resource” means an energy resource located on a
customer’s premises that:
(1) produces or stores electricity; or

SENATE BILL 598 7
(2) modifies the timing or amount of the customer’s electricity
consumption.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.